Hawaii statutes.
[§431:31-108] Portable electronics
insurance claims. No licensed independent adjuster or licensed vendor
shall supervise more than twenty-five employees; provided that a licensed
vendor who supervises employees or adjusts claims shall not be required to be
licensed as an adjuster.

For purposes of this section:

"Automated claims adjudication
system" means a preprogrammed computer system designed for the collection,
data entry, calculation, and final resolution of portable electronics insurance
claims, which:

(1) Shall be used only by a licensed independent
adjuster, a licensed vendor, or supervised employees; and

(2) Shall comply with all claims-payment requirements
of the insurance code.

"Employee" means an individual who
collects claim information for portable electronics insurance claims from, or
furnishes claim information to, insureds or claimants, and who conducts data
entry, including entering data into an automated claims adjudication system. [L
2012, c 321, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next